Maryland, session 2025, HB0708.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–704.
(a) In this section, “taxpayer” means:
(1) an individual filing an income tax return; or
(2) a married couple filing a joint income tax return.
(b) (1) A resident who is a taxpayer may claim a credit against the State
income tax for a taxable year in the amount determined under subsection (c) of this section
for earned income.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0708*

HOUSE BILL 708
(2) A resident who is a taxpayer may claim a credit against the county
income tax for a taxable year in the amount determined under subsection (d) of this section
for earned income.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection and
subject to subsection (e) of this section, the credit allowed against the State income tax
under subsection (b)(1) of this section is the lesser of:
(i) 50% of the earned income credit allowable for the taxable year
under § 32 of the Internal Revenue Code or that would have been allowable but for the
limitation under § 32(m) of the Internal Revenue Code; or
(ii) the State income tax for the taxable year.
(2) (i) Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph and subsection (e)
of this section, a resident may claim a refund in the amount, if any, by which the applicable
percentage specified in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph of the earned income credit
allowable for the taxable year under § 32 of the Internal Revenue Code exceeds the State
income tax for the taxable year.
(ii) Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, the applicable
percentage of the earned income credit allowable under § 32 of the Internal Revenue Code
to be used for purposes of determining the refund provided under this paragraph is:
1. 25% for a taxable year beginning after December 31, 2013,
but before January 1, 2015;
2. 25.5% for a taxable year beginning after December 31,
2014, but before January 1, 2016;
3. 26% for a taxable year beginning after December 31, 2015,
but before January 1, 2017;
4. 27% for a taxable year beginning after December 31, 2016,
but before January 1, 2018;
5. 28% for a taxable year beginning after December 31, 2017,
but before January 1, 2020; and
6. 45% for a taxable year beginning after December 31, 2019.
(iii) For purposes of determining the refund provided under this
paragraph, the earned income credit allowable under § 32 of the Internal Revenue Code is
calculated without regard to the limitation under § 32(m) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(3) (i) For purposes of this section for an individual without a qualifying

HOUSE BILL 708 3
child, the credit allowable for a taxable year under § 32 of the Internal Revenue Code is
calculated without regard to:
1. the minimum age requirement under § 32(c)(1)(A)(ii)(II) of
the Internal Revenue Code; or
2. the limitation under § 32(m) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(ii) [Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, the] THE credit
allowed against the State income tax under subsection (b)(1) of this section for an individual
without a qualifying child is:
1. equal to 100% of the earned income credit allowable for a
taxable year under § 32 of the Internal Revenue Code; AND
2. CALCULATED BY SUBSTITUTING:
A. $7,840 FOR THE EARNED INCOME AMOUNT IN §
32(B)(2)(A) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE; AND
B. $19,160 FOR THE PHASE–OUT AMOUNT IN §
32(B)(2)(A) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
[(iii) For a taxable year beginning after December 31, 2019, but before
January 1, 2023, the tax credit allowed under this paragraph may not exceed $530 for a
taxable year.]
(III) 1. FOR EACH TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER
DECEMBER 31, 2024, THE EARNED INCOME AMOUNT AND PHASE–OUT AMOUNT IN
SUBPARAGRAPH (II)2 OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE INCREASED BY AN AMOUNT
EQUAL TO THE PRODUCT OF MULTIPLYING EACH AMOUNT BY THE COST–OF–LIVING
ADJUSTMENT SPECIFIED IN SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH.
2. FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, THE
COST–OF–LIVING ADJUSTMENT IS THE COST–OF–LIVING ADJUSTMENT WITHIN THE
MEANING OF § 1(F)(3) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE FOR THE CALENDAR YEAR
IN WHICH THE TAXABLE YEAR BEGINS, AS DETERMINED BY THE COMPTROLLER BY
SUBSTITUTING “CALENDAR YEAR 2022” FOR “CALENDAR YEAR 2016” IN § 1(F)(3)(A)
OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
3. IF ANY INCREASE DETERMINED UNDER
SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH IS NOT A MULTIPLE OF $10, THE
INCREASE SHALL BE ROUNDED DOWN TO THE NEXT LOWEST MULTIPLE OF $10.

HOUSE BILL 708
(iv) If the tax credit allowed under this paragraph in any taxable year
exceeds the total tax otherwise payable by the individual without a qualifying child for that
taxable year, the individual may claim a refund in the amount of the excess.
(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection and subject to
subsection (e) of this section, the credit allowed against the county income tax under
subsection (b)(2) of this section is the lesser of:
(i) the earned income credit allowable for the taxable year under §
32 of the Internal Revenue Code or that would have been allowable but for the limitation
under § 32(m) of the Internal Revenue Code multiplied by 10 times the county income tax
rate for the taxable year; or
(ii) the county income tax for the taxable year.
(2) (i) A county may provide, by law, for a refundable county earned
income credit as provided in this paragraph.
(ii) If a county provides for a refundable county earned income credit
under this paragraph, on or before July 1 prior to the beginning of the first taxable year for
which it is applicable, the county shall give the Comptroller notice of the refundable county
earned income credit.
(iii) If a county provides for a refundable county earned income credit
under this paragraph, a resident may claim a refund of the amount, if any, by which the
product of multiplying the credit allowable for the taxable year under § 32 of the Internal
Revenue Code or that would have been allowable but for the limitation under § 32(m) of
the Internal Revenue Code by 5 times the county income tax rate for the taxable year
exceeds the county income tax for the taxable year.
(iv) The amount of any refunds payable under a refundable county
earned income credit operates to reduce the income tax revenue from individuals
attributable to the county income tax for that county.
(e) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, for an individual who is a
resident of the State for only a part of the year, the amount of the credit or refund allowed
under this section shall be determined based on the part of the earned income credit
allowable for the taxable year under § 32 of the Internal Revenue Code that is attributable
to Maryland, determined by multiplying the federal earned income credit by a fraction:
(i) the numerator of which is the Maryland adjusted gross income of
the individual; and
(ii) the denominator of which is the federal adjusted gross income of
the individual.
(2) For purposes of determining the amount of the credit or refund under

HOUSE BILL 708 5
paragraph (1) of this subsection, the part of the earned income credit allowable for the
taxable year under § 32 of the Internal Revenue Code is calculated without regard to the
limitation under § 32(m) of the Internal Revenue Code.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024.